Utah statutes.
53A-24-404.   Division responsibilities.

DSDHH may:

(1)  provide training and adjustment services for adults with hearing impairments;

(2)  assist public education officials in the discharge of their duties towards children with hearing impairments;

(3)  maintain a register of qualified interpreters;

(4)  provide training in the use of telecommunication devices for the deaf, and install and maintain those devices;

(5)  operate community centers for individuals with hearing impairments; and

(6)  perform other duties assigned by the executive director or the board.



Amended by Chapter 78, 1990 General Session

